Hawaii statutes.
§184-2 State park system. The
department of land and natural resources may designate and bring under its
control and management, as parts of the state park system, parks and parkways
as follows:

(1) Government owned land within the state forest
reserves or otherwise under the jurisdiction of the department may be set aside
as a state park or parkway by resolution of the department, subject to the
approval of the governor by executive order setting the land aside for such
purposes; provided that no lands within the state forest reserve areas that are
the watersheds from which the domestic water supply of any city, town or
community is or may be obtained shall be so set aside without the prior
approval of the state department of health and the prior approval of the board
of water supply or county council.

(2) County parks may be acquired for the state park
system by consent of the council of the county, if such council and the
department agree that the park is of such interest and importance to the people
of the whole State as to make such action appropriate.

(3) New parks and parkways may be established:

(A) By acquisition of property in the name of
the State, as the department may deem necessary or proper for the development,
extension, or improvement of the state park system, and as provided in section
184-3.

(B) By the setting aside of government owned
land for such purposes by the governor, as provided by law. [L 1949, c 185, pt
of §1; RL 1955, §19-33; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§19, 21; am L 1961, c 132, §2;
HRS §184-2]

Revision Note

References to board
of supervisors deleted to conform to county charters.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next